pt-PT: Equipamento > Ferramentas > Berbequins e chaves de impacto: Chaves de impacto; Chaves de fenda elétricas; Armas de parafuso
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøy > Muttertrekkere og -drivere: Slagskrutrekkere; Strømdrevne skrutrekkere; Skrupistoler
vi: Phần cứng > Công cụ > Máy vặn bu lông & Đầu vít: Máy bắt vít; Tua vít điện; Súng bắn vít
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankiai > Smūginiai veržliarakčiai ir atsuktuvai: Smūginiai atsuktuvai; Elektriniai atsuktuvai; Sriegimo pistoletai
hr-HR: Željezarija > Alati > Udarni ključevi i odvijači: Udarni odvijači; Električni odvijači; Pištolji za vijke
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktyg > Slagskruvdragare: Slagborr; Eldrivna skruvmejslar; Skruvpistoler
ko: 철물 > 도구 > 임팩트 렌치/드라이버: 임팩트 드라이버; 전동 스크루드라이버; 스크루 건
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschap > Slagmoersleutels: Standaard slagmoersleutels; Elektrische schroevendraaiers; Schroefpistolen
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Инструменты > Ударные гайковерты, отвертки и шуруповерты: Ударные шуруповерты; Электроотвертки; Шуруповерты
es: Bricolaje > Herramientas > Taladradores y llaves de impacto: Controladores de impacto; Destornilladores eléctricos; Pistolas de tornillo
da: Isenkram > Redskaber > Slagskruenøgler: Slagskruenøgler; Eldrevne skruetrækkere; Skruepistoler
sk-SK: Náradie > Nástroje > Rázové skrutkovače a uťahováky: Rázové uťahováky; Elektrické skrutkovače; Skrutkovače
fr: Quincaillerie > Outils > Clés et tournevis à chocs: Tournevis à chocs; Tournevis électriques; Pistolets à vis
pt-BR: Ferragens > Ferramentas > Chaves inglesas e de impacto: Chave de impacto; Chaves de fenda elétricas; Parafusadeiras
pl: Sprzęt > Narzędzia > Wkrętarki udarowe: Wkrętarki z udarem; Wkrętaki elektryczne; Wkrętarki
ro-RO: Feronerie > Unelte > Chei și elemente de acționare pneumatice: Elemente de acționare pneumatice; Șurubelnițe electrice; Pistoale cu șuruburi
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具 > 棘輪扳手和起子: 衝擊起子; 電動起子; 螺絲起子機
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeuge > Schlagschrauber: Schlagschraubendreher; Schraubvorrichtungen; Schraubpistolen
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Orodja > Udarni ključi in gonilniki: Udarni gonilniki; Električni izvijači; Pnevmatske vijačne pištole
bg-BG: Железария > Инструменти > Ударни гайковерти и винтоверти: Ударни винтоверти; Електрически винтоверти; Пистолети за видии
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > เครื่องมือ > บล็อกลม: ไขควงกระแทก; ไขควงไฟฟ้า; ปืนไขควง
en: Hardware > Tools > Impact Wrenches & Drivers: Impact Drivers; Power Screwdrivers; Screw Guns
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalut > Iskuvääntimet ja iskuporakoneet: Iskuporakoneet; Sähköiset ruuvimeisselit; Ruuvipistoolit
hu: Hardver > Szerszámok > Ütköző csavarkulcsok és behajtók: Ütvebehajtók; Erőcsavarhúzók; Csavarpisztolyok
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Εργαλεία > Κρουστικά κλειδιά & κρουστικοί οδηγοί: Κρουστικοί οδηγοί; Ηλεκτρικά κατσαβίδια; Πιστόλια βιδών
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Utensili > Avvitatori a impulsi: Avvitatore a percussione; Cacciaviti elettrici; Pistole a vite
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nářadí a nástroje > Rázové utahováky: Rázové šroubováky; Elektrické šroubováky; Šroubovací pistole
ja: DIY用品 > 工具 > インパクトレンチ・インパクトドライバー: インパクトドライバー; 電動ドライバー; スクリューガン
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具 > 冲击扳手/起子: 冲击起子; 电动螺丝刀; 螺丝枪
tr: Hırdavat > Aletler > Darbeli Anahtar ve Vidalamalar: Darbeli Vidalama; Elektrikli Tornavidalar; Vida Tabancaları